pt-PT: Estilo de montagem do câmbio: Braze-on; Abraçadeira de 28,6 mm; Abraçadeira de 31,8 mm; Abraçadeira de 34,9 mm; Montagem direta; Tipo E; Abraçadeira alta; Abraçadeira baixa; Montagem de suporte padrão; UDH; Outro
ko: 변속기 장착 방식: 브레이즈온; 클램프 28.6mm; 클램프 31.8mm; 클램프 34.9mm; 다이렉트 마운트; E-타입; 하이 클램프; 로우 클램프; 스탠다드 행어 마운트; UDH; 기타
sl-SI: Način montaže menjalnika: Prispajkano; Objemka 28,6 mm; Objemka 31,8 mm; Objemka 34,9 mm; Neposredna namestitev; Tip E; Visoka objemka; Nizka objemka; Standardni nosilec menjalnika; UDH; Drugo
ro-RO: Stilul de montare al schimbătorului de foi: Lipit (braze-on); Colier 28,6 mm; Colier 31,8 mm; Colier 34,9 mm; Montare directă; Tip E; Colier înalt; Colier jos; Montură standard cu ureche; UDH; Altele
fi: Vaihtajan kiinnitystapa: Juotettava kiinnitys; Panta 28,6 mm; Panta 31,8 mm; Panta 34,9 mm; Suorakiinnitys; E-tyyppi; Korkea panta; Matala panta; Vakiokorvakekiinnitys; UDH; Muu
it: Stile di montaggio del deragliatore: A saldare; Fascetta da 28,6 mm; Fascetta da 31,8 mm; Fascetta da 34,9 mm; Montaggio diretto; Tipo E; Fascetta alta; Fascetta bassa; Montaggio standard su forcellino; UDH; Altro
cs: Způsob montáže přehazovačky: Navářka; Objímka 28,6 mm; Objímka 31,8 mm; Objímka 34,9 mm; Přímá montáž; E-type; Horní objímka; Spodní objímka; Standardní montáž na hák; UDH; Jiné
vi: Kiểu lắp đặt đề: Gắn trực tiếp (braze-on); Kẹp 28,6 mm; Kẹp 31,8 mm; Kẹp 34,9 mm; Gắn trực tiếp; Loại E; Kẹp cao; Kẹp thấp; Gắn móc treo tiêu chuẩn; UDH; Khác
pt-BR: Estilo de montagem do câmbio: Braze-on; Braçadeira 28,6 mm; Braçadeira 31,8 mm; Braçadeira 34,9 mm; Montagem direta; Tipo E; Braçadeira alta; Braçadeira baixa; Montagem padrão com gancheira; UDH; Outro
zh-CN: 后拨安装方式: 铜焊式 (Braze-on); 夹环 28.6 mm; 夹环 31.8 mm; 夹环 34.9 mm; 直装式; E 型; 高位夹环; 低位夹环; 标准吊耳式; UDH; 其他
ru: Способ крепления переключателя: Braze-on (на упор); Хомут 28,6 мм; Хомут 31,8 мм; Хомут 34,9 мм; Direct Mount (прямое крепление); E-type; Верхний хомут (High clamp); Нижний хомут (Low clamp); Стандартный петух; UDH; Другое
hu: Váltó rögzítési stílusa: Konzolos; Bilincses (28,6 mm); Bilincses (31,8 mm); Bilincses (34,9 mm); Közvetlen rögzítésű; E-típusú; Felső bilincses; Alsó bilincses; Szabványos váltófülre rögzíthető; UDH; Egyéb
sk-SK: Spôsob montáže prehadzovačky: Na návarku (Braze-on); Objímka 28,6 mm; Objímka 31,8 mm; Objímka 34,9 mm; Priama montáž; E-type; Horná objímka; Spodná objímka; Štandardná montáž na pätku; UDH; Iné
ja: ディレイラーの取り付けスタイル: 直付け; クランプ 28.6 mm; クランプ 31.8 mm; クランプ 34.9 mm; ダイレクトマウント; Eタイプ; ハイクランプ; ロークランプ; スタンダードハンガーマウント; UDH; その他
sv: Växelförarens monteringsstil: Braze-on; Klämma 28,6 mm; Klämma 31,8 mm; Klämma 34,9 mm; Direktmontering; E-typ; Hög klämma; Låg klämma; Standardfäste för växelöra; UDH; Övrigt
hr-HR: Način montaže mjenjača: Braze-on; Obujmica 28,6 mm; Obujmica 31,8 mm; Obujmica 34,9 mm; Izravna montaža; E-tip; Visoka obujmica; Niska obujmica; Standardni nosač mjenjača; UDH; Ostalo
pl: Styl mocowania przerzutki: Braze-on; Obejma 28,6 mm; Obejma 31,8 mm; Obejma 34,9 mm; Mocowanie bezpośrednie; Typ E; Wysoka obejma; Niska obejma; Standardowe mocowanie na hak; UDH; Inne
nb: Monteringsstil for girskifter: Braze-on; Klemme 28,6 mm; Klemme 31,8 mm; Klemme 34,9 mm; Direktemontert; E-type; Høy klemme; Lav klemme; Standard festemontering; UDH; Annet
fr: Style de fixation du dérailleur: À braser; Collier 28,6 mm; Collier 31,8 mm; Collier 34,9 mm; Montage direct; Type E; Collier haut; Collier bas; Fixation standard sur patte; UDH; Autre
de: Montageart des Schaltwerks: Anlöt; Schelle 28,6 mm; Schelle 31,8 mm; Schelle 34,9 mm; Direct-Mount; E-Type; High-Clamp; Low-Clamp; Standard-Schaltauge; UDH; Sonstige
en: Derailleur mounting style: Braze-on; Clamp 28.6 mm; Clamp 31.8 mm; Clamp 34.9 mm; Direct mount; E-type; High clamp; Low clamp; Standard hanger mount; UDH; Other
lt-LT: Pavarų perjungiklio montavimo stilius: Prilituojamas; Apkaba 28,6 mm; Apkaba 31,8 mm; Apkaba 34,9 mm; Tiesioginis tvirtinimas; E tipo; Aukšta apkaba; Žema apkaba; Standartinis tvirtinimas prie kablio; UDH; Kita
zh-TW: 變速器安裝方式: 銅焊座; 環束式 28.6 mm; 31.8 mm 夾環; 34.9 mm 夾環; 直鎖式; E 型; 高夾環式; 低夾環式; 標準吊架固定式; UDH; 其他
el: Στυλ τοποθέτησης μηχανισμού αλλαγής ταχυτήτων: Braze-on; Σφιγκτήρας 28,6 mm; Σφιγκτήρας 31,8 mm; Σφιγκτήρας 34,9 mm; Απευθείας τοποθέτηση; Τύπου E; Σφιγκτήρας ψηλά; Σφιγκτήρας χαμηλά; Τοποθέτηση σε τυπικό νύχι; UDH; Άλλο
th: รูปแบบการติดตั้งตีนผี: แป้นเชื่อมเฟรม; แคลมป์ 28.6 มม.; แคลมป์ 31.8 มม.; แคลมป์ 34.9 มม.; ไดเรกต์เมาท์; E-type; แคลมป์สูง; แคลมป์ต่ำ; ยึดดรอปเอาต์มาตรฐาน; UDH; อื่นๆ
da: Derailleurs monteringsstil: Braze-on; Klemme 28,6 mm; Klemme 31,8 mm; Klemme 34,9 mm; Direct mount; E-type; High clamp; Low clamp; Standard montering på geardrop; UDH; Andet
tr: Aktarıcı montaj türü: Kulaklı (braze-on); Kelepçeli 28,6 mm; Kelepçeli 31,8 mm; Kelepçeli 34,9 mm; Doğrudan montajlı; E tipi; Yüksek kelepçeli; Düşük kelepçeli; Standart kulak montajlı; UDH; Diğer
nl: Derailleur bevestigingswijze: Aanlas; Klem 28,6 mm; Klem 31,8 mm; Klem 34,9 mm; Direct mount; E-type; Hoge klem; Lage klem; Standaard padmontage; UDH; Overige
es: Estilo de montaje del desviador: Soldadura (braze-on); Abrazadera de 28,6 mm; Abrazadera de 31,8 mm; Abrazadera de 34,9 mm; Montaje directo; Tipo E; Abrazadera alta; Abrazadera baja; Montaje de patilla estándar; UDH; Otro
bg-BG: Стил на монтаж на дерайльора: Braze-on; Скоба 28,6 mm; Скоба 31,8 mm; Скоба 34,9 mm; Директен монтаж; E-type; Висока скоба; Ниска скоба; Стандартен монтаж на ухо; UDH; Друго